Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 2. Creation.

§79-10-11.
Election of professional corporation status.

One or more persons may incorporate a professional corporation by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of incorporation which include a statement that (a) it is a professional corporation, and (b) its purpose is to render the specified professional services.

A corporation incorporated under a general law of this state (other than a professional corporation in existence on July 1, 1995, which is subject to the provisions of Section 79-10-111) may elect professional corporation status by amending its articles of incorporation to comply with subsection (1) of this section and Section 79-10-21.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a person rendering professional services in this state to render such services through a professional corporation or foreign professional corporation unless a law of this state other than this chapter so requires.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Pursuant to Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected an error in a statutory reference in subsection (2) by substituting “...subsection (1) of this section...” for “...section (1) of this subsection...” The correction was ratified by the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 156 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 50 et seq.

§79-10-13.
Purposes.

Except to the extent authorized by subsection (2) of this section, a corporation may elect professional corporation status under Section 79-10-11 solely for the purpose of rendering professional services (including services ancillary to them) and solely within a single profession.

A corporation may elect professional corporation status under Section 79-10-11 for the purpose of rendering professional services within two (2) or more professions, and for the purpose of engaging in any lawful business authorized by Section 79-4-3.01, Mississippi Code of 1972, to the extent the combination of professional purposes or of professional and business purposes is not prohibited by the licensing law of this state applicable to each profession in the combination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Corporate name, see § 79-10-21.

Applicability of this section to foreign professional corporation, see § 79-10-91.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 156 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 50 et seq.

§79-10-15.
General powers.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a professional corporation has the powers enumerated in Section 79-4-3.02, Mississippi Code of 1972.

A professional corporation may be a promoter, general partner, member, associate, or manager of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other entity only if the entity is engaged solely in rendering professional services or in carrying on business authorized by the professional corporation’s articles of incorporation and not prohibited by the licensing laws applicable to each profession rendering services through the professional corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 164.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1715-1866..

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 651 et seq.

§79-10-17.
Rendering professional services.

A domestic or foreign corporation may render professional services in this state only through individuals licensed or otherwise authorized in this state to render the services.

Subsection (1) does not:

Require an individual employed by a professional corporation to be licensed to perform services for the corporation if a license is not otherwise required;

Prohibit a licensed individual from rendering professional services in his individual capacity although he is a shareholder, director, officer, employee or agent of a domestic or foreign professional corporation;

Prohibit an individual licensed in another state from rendering professional services for a domestic or foreign professional corporation in this state if not prohibited by the licensing authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Prohibited activities, see § 79-10-19.

§79-10-19.
Prohibited activities.

A professional corporation may not render any professional service other than the professional service authorized by its articles of incorporation.

Subsection (1) does not prohibit a professional corporation from investing its funds in real estate, mortgages, securities, or any other type of investment or from owning real or personal property appropriate for carrying on its business.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§79-10-21.
Corporate name.

The name of a domestic professional corporation and of a foreign professional corporation authorized to transact business in this state, in addition to satisfying the requirements of Sections 79-4-4.01 and 79-4-15.06, Mississippi Code of 1972:

Must contain the words “professional corporation” or “professional association” or the abbreviations “P.C.,” “PC,” “P.A.” or “PA”;

May not contain language stating or implying that it is incorporated for a purpose other than that authorized by Section 79-10-13 and its articles of incorporation; and

Must conform with any rule promulgated by the licensing authority having jurisdiction over a professional service described in the corporation’s articles of incorporation.

Sections 79-4-4.01 and 79-4-15.06, Mississippi Code of 1972, do not prevent the use of a name otherwise prohibited by those sections if it is the personal name of a shareholder or former shareholder of the domestic or foreign professional corporation or the name of an individual who was associated with a predecessor of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Name of foreign professional corporation, see § 79-10-21.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 228-250.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 132 et seq.